Illinois, session 104th, HB512.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Child Extended Bereavement Leave Act is 5amended by changing Section 1 as follows: 6    (820 ILCS 156/1)7    Sec. 1. Short title; references to Act. 8    (a) This Act may be cited as the the Child Extended 9Bereavement Leave Act.10    (b) This Act may be referred to as Zachary's Parent 11Protection Act. 12(Source: P.A. 103-466, eff. 1-1-24.)